lexc-files/prs-num/indicative-participial.txt
!=============================
LEXICON IntrIndPtcp
!  person/number markers for
!     intransitive indicative
!     intransitive participial
!=============================

[3Sg]:%^            #;    [1Sg]:%^%{.m.%}nga     #;    [2Sg]:%^%{.m.%}ten    #;
[3Pl]:%^%{.m.%}t    #;    [1Pl]:%^%{.m.%}%^kut   #;    [2Pl]:%^%{.m.%}si     #;
[3Du]:%^%{.m.%}%^k  #;    [1Du]:%^%{.m.%}%^kung  #;    [2Du]:%^%{.m.%}%^tek  #;
! extra ^ is to prevent these k's from assimilating to the dropped consonant


!=============================
LEXICON TrnsIndPtcp
!  person/number markers for
!     transitive indicative
!     transitive participial
!=============================

!------------------------|--------------------------|---------------------------|
[3Sg][3Sg]:%^a          #; [3Sg][3Pl]:%^i          #; [3Sg][3Du]:%^q           #;
[3Pl][3Sg]:%^at         #; [3Pl][3Pl]:%^it         #; [3Pl][3Du]:%^gket        #;
[3Du][3Sg]:%^it         #; [3Du][3Pl]:%^ik         #; [3Du][3Du]:%^gket        #;
!------------------------|--------------------------|---------------------------|
[1Sg][3Sg]:%^qa         #; [1Sg][3Pl]:%^nka        #; [1Sg][3Du]:%^gka         #;
[1Pl][3Sg]:%^put        #; [1Pl][3Pl]:%^put        #; [1Pl][3Du]:%^gput        #;
[1Du][3Sg]:%^pung       #; [1Du][3Pl]:%^pung       #; [1Du][3Du]:%^gpung       #;
!------------------------|--------------------------|---------------------------|
[2Sg][3Sg]:%^n          #; [2Sg][3Pl]:%^ten        #; [2Sg][3Du]:%^gken        #;
[2Pl][3Sg]:%^si         #; [2Pl][3Pl]:%^si         #; [2Pl][3Du]:%^gsi         #;
[2Du][3Sg]:%^tek        #; [2Du][3Pl]:%^tek        #; [2Du][3Du]:%^gtek        #;
!------------------------|--------------------------|---------------------------|
[3Sg][1Sg]:%^anga       #; [3Sg][1Pl]:%^inkut      #; [3Sg][1Du]:%^inkung      #;
[3Pl][1Sg]:%^atnga      #; [3Pl][1Pl]:%^inkut      #; [3Pl][1Du]:%^inkung      #;
[3Du][1Sg]:%^agnenga    #; [3Du][1Pl]:%^inkut      #; [3Du][1Du]:%^inkung      #;
!------------------------|--------------------------|---------------------------|
[2Sg][1Sg]:%^penga      #; [2Sg][1Pl]:%^pekut      #; [2Sg][1Du]:%^pekung      #;
[2Pl][1Sg]:%^pesinga    #; [2Pl][1Pl]:%^pesikut    #; [2Pl][1Du]:%^pesikung    #;
[2Du][1Sg]:%^petegnenga #; [2Du][1Pl]:%^petegnekut #; [2Du][1Du]:%^petegnekung #;
!------------------------|--------------------------|---------------------------|
[3Sg][2Sg]:%^aten       #; [3Sg][2Pl]:%^isi        #; [3Sg][2Du]:%^itek        #;
[3Pl][2Sg]:%^aten       #; [3Pl][2Pl]:%^isi        #; [3Pl][2Du]:%^itek        #;
[3Du][2Sg]:%^aten       #; [3Du][2Pl]:%^isi        #; [3Du][2Du]:%^itek        #;
!------------------------|--------------------------|---------------------------|
[1Sg][2Sg]:%^mken       #; [1Sg][2Pl]:%^msi        #; [1Sg][2Du]:%^mtek        #;
[1Pl][2Sg]:%^mken       #; [1Pl][2Pl]:%^msi        #; [1Pl][2Du]:%^mtek        #;
[1Du][2Sg]:%^mken       #; [1Du][2Pl]:%^msi        #; [1Du][2Du]:%^mtek        #;
!------------------------|--------------------------|---------------------------|
